Utah statutes.
76-9-301.1.   Dog fighting -- Training dogs for fighting -- Dog fighting
exhibitions.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person to:
(a)  own, possess, keep, or train a dog with the intent to engage it in an
exhibition of fighting with another dog;
(b)  cause a dog to fight with another dog or cause a dog to injure another
dog for amusement or gain;
(c)  tie, attach, or fasten any live animal to a machine or device propelled
by any power, for the purpose of causing the animal to be pursued by a dog; or
(d)  permit or allow any act which violates Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) on
any premises under his charge; or to control, aid, or abet any such act.
(2)  Possession of any breaking stick, treadmill, wheel, hot walker, cat mill,
cat walker, jenni, or other paraphernalia together with evidence that the
paraphernalia is being used or is intended for use in the unlawful training of
a dog to fight with another dog, together with the possession of any such dog,
is prima facie evidence of violation of Subsections (1)(b) and (c).
(3)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a third degree felony,
and any fine imposed may not exceed $25,000.
(4)  It is unlawful for a person to knowingly and intentionally be present as
a spectator at any place, building, or tenement where preparations are being
made for an exhibition of dog fighting, or to knowingly and intentionally be
present at a dog fighting exhibition or any other occurrence of fighting or
injury described in this section.  A person who violates this subsection is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(5)  Nothing in this section prohibits any of the following:
(a)  the use of dogs for management of livestock by the owner, his employees
or agents, or any other person in the lawful custody of livestock;
(b)  the use of dogs for hunting; or
(c)  the training of dogs or the possession or use of equipment in the
training of dogs for any purpose not prohibited by law.
